District of Columbia statutes.
47-4436

Applicability in certain cases.

(a)

The provisions of this subchapter relating to the offset of tax refunds of individuals who are in arrears with court-ordered child support payments shall apply to income tax refunds issued after September 18, 1982.

(b)

The provisions of this subchapter relating to the offset of tax refunds of individuals in default under the federal student loan programs shall apply to income tax refunds issued for tax years 1987 and thereafter.

(c)

The provisions of this section relating to an offset of tax refunds of individuals who received overpayments of unemployment compensation shall apply to income tax refunds issued for Tax Year 1993 and subsequent years.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 405(b), 48 DCR 334

History